Rhode Island statutes. Title 46 Waters and Navigation
Chapter 12.2 Rhode Island Infrastructure Bank
46-12.2-18.
Bonds not obligations of the state.

Bonds issued by the agency under the provisions of this chapter or chapter 18 of title 24 shall not be deemed to be a debt or a pledge of the faith and credit of the state or of any of its political subdivisions, but shall be payable solely from the revenues, funds, assets, and other property of the agency from which they are made payable pursuant to this chapter or chapter 18 of title 24. Bonds issued by the agency under the provisions of this chapter and chapter 18 of title 24 shall recite that neither the state nor any political subdivisions thereof shall be obligated to pay the bonds, and that neither the faith and credit nor the taxing power of the state or of any political subdivision thereof is pledged to the payment of the principal of or interest on the bonds. Further, every bond shall recite whether it is a general obligation of the agency, or a special obligation thereof payable solely from particular revenues, funds, assets, or other property pledged to its payment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 303, § 2; P.L. 2013, ch. 144, art. 20, § 2.

46-12.2-19.
Lien status — Recording.

Notwithstanding any provision of any other law, including the Uniform Commercial Code:

Any pledge or assignment of revenues of any kind, funds, loan agreements, local governmental obligations, property, or assets made pursuant to the provisions of this chapter or chapter 18 of title 24 by the agency, or any local governmental unit hereunder, shall be valid and binding against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract, or otherwise, whether or not the parties have notice thereof, and shall be deemed continuously perfected from the time it is made;

No filing of any kind with respect to a pledge or assignment need be made under the Uniform Commercial Code, as amended, or otherwise;

Unless otherwise provided in the loan agreement, a pledge of revenues of any kind shall be deemed to include a pledge of any accounts or general intangibles from which the pledged revenues are derived, whether existing at the time of the pledge or thereafter coming into existence, and whether held at the time of the pledge or thereafter acquired by the agency or local governmental unit, and the proceeds of the accounts or general intangibles; and

The pledge of revenues of any kind, accounts, and general intangibles shall be subject to the lien of the pledge without delivery or segregation, and the lien of the pledge shall be valid and binding against all parties having claims of contract or tort or otherwise against the agency or local governmental unit.

A pledge of revenues of any kind under this chapter or chapter 18 of title 24 shall constitute a sufficient appropriation thereof for the purposes of any provision for appropriation, and the revenues may be applied as required by the pledge without further appropriation.

For the purposes of this section, the word “pledge” shall be construed to include the grant of a security interest under the Uniform Commercial Code.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 303, § 2; P.L. 2013, ch. 144, art. 20, § 2.

46-12.2-20.
Bonds and local government obligations as investment securities.

Notwithstanding any of the provisions of this chapter, chapter 18 of title 24, or any recitals in any bonds or local governmental obligations issued hereunder, all bonds and local governmental obligations shall be deemed to be investment securities under the Uniform Commercial Code.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 303, § 2; P.L. 2013, ch. 144, art. 20, § 2.

46-12.2-21.
Proceeds received by agency as trust funds.

All moneys received by the agency pursuant to the provisions of this chapter or chapter 18 of title 24, whether as proceeds from the issue of bonds or as revenues or otherwise, shall be deemed to be trust funds to be held and applied solely as provided in these chapters.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 303, § 2; P.L. 2013, ch. 144, art. 20, § 2.

46-12.2-22.
Tax exemption.

Bonds issued by the agency and local governmental obligations issued by any local governmental unit in accordance with this chapter or chapter 18 of title 24, their transfer and the income therefrom, including any profit made on the sale thereof, shall, at all times, be exempt from taxation by and within the state. The agency shall not be required to pay any taxes, assessments, or excises upon its income, existence, operation, or property.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 303, § 2; P.L. 2013, ch. 144, art. 20, § 2.

46-12.2-23.
Duration of agency — Termination.

The agency and its corporate existence shall continue until terminated by law; provided, however, that no such law shall take effect so long as the agency shall have bonds outstanding, unless adequate provision has been made for the payment or satisfaction thereof. Upon termination of the agency, the title to all funds and other properties owned by it, which remain after provision for the payment or satisfaction of all bonds of the agency, shall vest in the state. The obligations, debts, and liabilities of the agency shall be assumed by and imposed upon the state, and shall be transferred to the state general treasurer or to such other successor as the general assembly may designate.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 303, § 2.

46-12.2-24.
Record keeping — Financial statements.

The agency shall, at all times, keep full and accurate accounts of its receipts, expenditures, disbursements, assets, and liabilities which shall be open to inspection by any officer or duly appointed agent of the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 303, § 2; P.L. 2001, ch. 180, § 148; P.L. 2005, ch. 316, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 320, § 1.

46-12.2-24.1.
Reporting requirements.

Within ninety (90) days after the end of each fiscal year, the agency shall submit an annual report to the governor, the speaker of the house of representatives, the president of the senate, and the secretary of state of its activities during that fiscal year. The report shall provide: a summary of the agency’s meetings including when the agency met, subjects addressed, decisions rendered and meeting minutes; a summary of the agency’s actions including a listing of rules, regulations, or procedures adopted or amended, applications received for financial assistance for water pollution abatement projects, contracts or agreements entered into, applications and intended use plans submitted to federal agencies for capitalization grants, properties acquired or leased, and bonds issued; a synopsis of any complaints, suspensions, or other legal matters related to the authority of the agency; a consolidated financial statement of all funds received and disbursed by the agency including the source of and recipient of the funds which shall be audited by an independent certified public accountant firm; copies of audits or reports required under federal law; a listing of the staff and/or consultants employed by the agency; a listing of findings and recommendation derived from agency activities; and a summary of performance during the previous fiscal year including accomplishments, shortcomings and remedies. The report shall be posted as prescribed in §

42-20-8.2

. The director of the department of administration shall be responsible for the enforcement of this provision.

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 316, § 2; P.L. 2005, ch. 320, § 2.

46-12.2-25.
Supplemental powers — Inconsistent laws.

The provisions of this chapter and chapter 19.16 of title 23, chapter 18 of title 24, and chapter 26.5 of title 39 shall be deemed to provide an additional, alternative, and complete method for accomplishing the purposes of these chapters, and shall be deemed and construed to be supplemental and additional to, and not in derogation of, powers conferred upon the agency, the department, and local governmental units by other laws; provided, however, that insofar as the provisions of these chapters are inconsistent with the provisions of any general or special law, municipal charter, administrative order or regulations, the provisions of these chapters shall be controlling. Any amounts appropriated by these chapters to the agency or the department shall be in addition to any other amounts appropriated to the agency or the department by any other law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 303, § 2; P.L. 2013, ch. 144, art. 20, § 2; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 14, § 17.

46-12.2-25.1.
Administrative procedures.

The agency shall be subject to the provisions of chapter 35 of title 42.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 259, § 3.

46-12.2-26.
Compliance with federal law.

Notwithstanding anything to the contrary herein, the provisions of this chapter are limited to the extent required by applicable federal law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 303, § 2.

46-12.2-27.
Severability — Liberal construction.

The provisions of this chapter are severable, and if any provision hereof shall be held invalid in any circumstances, any invalidity shall not affect any other provisions or circumstances. This chapter shall be construed in all respects so as to meet any constitutional requirements. In carrying out the purposes and provisions of this chapter, all steps shall be taken which are necessary to meet constitutional requirements. This chapter shall be construed liberally in aid of its purpose and legislative findings.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 303, § 2.